District of Columbia statutes.
10-1181.01

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the terms:

(1)

“Department” means the District Department of Transportation.

(2)

“Director” means the Director of the District Department of Transportation.

(3)

“Private structure” means a fixture or other structure built on public space or in the public right of way constructed by a private person or entity, with or without the permission of the District.

(4)

“Public right of way” means the surface, the air space above the surface (including air space immediately adjoining and above a private structure), and the area below the surface of any public street, bridge, tunnel, highway, lane, path, alley, sidewalk, or boulevard.

(5)

“Public space” means all the publicly-owned property within the property lines of a street, park, or other public property as such property lines are shown on the land records of the District, and includes any roadway, tree space, sidewalk, or parking within such property lines.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6022, 51 DCR 8441

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle C of title VI of Law 15-205: Section 6021 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle C of title VI of the act may be cited as the Abatement of Dangerous Conditions on Public Space Act of 2004.